Hawaii, session 2025, HB365.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that octopus farming poses significant risks for disease transmission to marine environments.  Farmed octopuses frequently carry multiple pathogens, such as coccidial parasites, ichthyobodo protozoa, vibrio bacterial infections, and dicyemid mesozoans.  All of these pathogens can spread to wild marine environments.  For example, coccidial parasites can spread from farmed octopuses to crabs, which can then spread to wild octopus populations and other marine animals, creating a cycle of reinfection and amplification in the ecosystem.  The legislature further finds that this spread could have destabilizing effects on the food web and commercial fishing industries. The legislature also finds that the practice of octopus farming has raised ethical concerns due to the advanced cognitive abilities exhibited by these animals.  The legislature additionally finds that octopus farming practices and conditions, including inadequate living conditions and confinement, may subject octopuses to stress, compromise their well-being, and lead to adverse behavioral changes.  The absence of guidelines in octopus farming poses risks of exploitation and potential harm to the welfare of these intelligent marine creatures. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to prohibit the farming of certain non-wild-caught octopuses for human consumption. SECTION 2.  Chapter 141, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part IV to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§141-     Octopus aquaculture; prohibited.  (a) No person shall engage in any aquaculture activities in the State that include the propagation, cultivation, maintenance, and harvesting of any species of octopus for the purpose of human consumption. (b)  As used in this section: "Aquaculture activities" includes the use of land-based recirculating aquaculture systems. "Octopus" does not include wild-caught octopuses or octopuses propagated, cultivated, maintained, or harvested only for research purposes." SECTION 3.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.